District of Columbia statutes.
8-104.31

Remediation of contaminated sediment in the Anacostia River.

By June 30, 2018, the Director of the District Department of the Environment shall adopt and publish a record of decision in the District of Columbia Register choosing the remedy for remediation of contaminated sediment in the Anacostia River. The remedial choice shall be based on the remedial investigation and feasibility study results and shall be consistent with the National Contingency Plan set forth in 40 C.F.R. Part 300 , and with section 121 of the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Act, approved October 17, 1986 (100 Stat. 1672 ; 42 U.S.C. § 9621 ).

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 6092, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6102 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6092 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6092 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).